Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department must administer a grant program to provide grants to providers that operate diaper banks. Grant funding must be used for the purchase of diapers, wipes, and other essential baby products for distribution to families in need.(2) Providers must apply for grant funding in a manner and on a timeline determined by the department.(3) The department must prioritize grants to providers serving or located in marginalized low-income communities or communities of color that are members of the national diaper bank network or equivalent successor organization, or, in communities where a national diaper bank network member does not exist, providers with sufficient storage, purchasing ability, and distribution capacity to manage the grant, and at least a two-year track record of distributing baby or other family essentials goods at scale.(4) By December 1, 2025, and on an annual basis thereafter, the department must publish a report on its website detailing grants awarded through the program.(5) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.--- END ---